South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3535.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  This act may be cited as the "Helping Alleviate Lawful Obstruction (HALO) Act." SECTION 2.  Article 11, Chapter 3, Title 16 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 16-3-1092. (A) As used in this section, the term: (1) "First responder" includes a law enforcement officer, a firefighter, and an emergency medical care provider. (2) "Harass" means to wilfully engage in a course of conduct directed at a first responder which intentionally causes substantial emotional distress in that first responder and serves no legitimate purpose. (B) It is unlawful for a person, after receiving a verbal warning not to approach from a person he knows or reasonably should know is a first responder who is engaged in the lawful performance of a legal duty, to knowingly and wilfully violate the warning and approach or remain within twenty-five feet of the first responder with the intent to: (1) impede or interfere with the first responder's ability to perform his duty; (2) threaten the first responder with physical harm; or (3) harass the first responder. (C) A person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, must be fined not more than five hundred dollars and imprisoned not more than sixty days. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----